dictsource/ur_rules
// This ur_rules file is written by Him Prasad Gautam (Kathmandu, Nepal) and Ejaz Shah (Pakistan).
// This file is UTF8 encoded 
//  phoneme rules for Urdu
// Letter group - l01: Vowels

.replace
٠	0
١	1
٢	2
٣	3
٤	4
٥	5
٦	6
٧	7
٨	8
٩	9
ي	ی

// vowel signs, alif acts as consonants  at start of word if these follow
.L01  َ ِ ُ و ی ع ا ے آ ٰ ٗ

// Consonants
.L02  ب بھ پ پھ ت تھ ٹ ٹھ ث ج جھ چ چھ ح خ د دھ ڈ ڈھ ذ ر ڑ ز ژ س ش ص ض ط ظ غ ف ق ک کھ گ گھ ل م ن ہ ئ

// Letter group - L03
.L03  آ ا ب بھ پ پھ ت تھ ٹ ٹھ ث ج جھ چ چھ ح خ د دھ ڈ ڈھ ذ ر ڑ ز ژ س ش ص ض ط ظ ع غ ف ق ک کھ گ گھ ل م ن و ہ ئ ی ے ٰ

// Letter group L04
.L04  ب ث ج ح خ د ذ ر ز س ش ص ض ط ظ غ ف ق ک ل م ن

// Letter group L05
.L05  ب ت ث ج ح خ د ذ ر ز س ش ص ض ط ظ ع غ ف ق ک ل م ن و ہ

// Letter group L06
.L06  آ ا ب ت ث ج ح خ د ذ ر ز س ش ص ض ط ظ ع غ ف ق ک ل م ن و ہ ی ٰ

// Letter group L07
.L07  ب ت ث ج ح خ د ذ ر ز س ش ص ض ط ظ غ ف ق ک ل م ن ہ

// VOWELS

.group َ
	َ	a
	َی 	E
	َے	E
	َو 	aU
	َع	a:

.group ِ
	ِ	I
	ِی	i:
	ِع(L02	I
	L03L03) ِ (_S1	'e:

.group ُ
	ُ	U
	ُو	u:
	ُع	O

.group ٗ
	ٗ	u:

.group ھ
	ھ	HV 
	ھ (_	H:
ھ (l01	H

.group ٰ
	ٰ	a:
	ٰی	a:

.group ا
	ا	a:
	_) ا (L01   // Acts like Consonants if followed by a vowel but is silent.
_) ا	a
_) او	o:
_) ای	e:
	ائ(L02	'a:I
	اہ(_	a:H
	_)اتن(L01	'Itn
	_) اتر	Ut'aR
	_) اتر (L01	UtR
	_) الٹ	Ul'at.
	_) الٹ (L01	Ult.
	_) الجھ	Ul'aJh
	_) الجھ (L01	UlJh
	_) ابھر	Ubh'aR
	_) ابھر (L01	UbhR
	_) اچھل	Uch'al
	_) اچھل (L01	Uchl
	_) اجڑ	UJ'ar.
	_) اجڑ (L01	UJr.
	افتتاح	,ItIt'a:H
	اسلام	,Isl'a:m
	_) انسان	Ins'a:n
	_)اندیش	ande:S
	_)انت(L02ا	IntI
	_) امید	Um'i:d
	اً(_S2	'an
	_) امکان	,Imk'a:n
	_) افسر	,afs'aR
	_) اتفاق	,ItIf'a:q
	_) ابتدا	'Ibt,Ida:
	_) ایمان	i:m'a:n
	_) اعت	'e:tI
	_) اضاف	Iz'a:f
	_) اسمبلی	as'ambli:
	_) اٹھت	'Ut.#t
	_) اٹھن	'Ut.#n
	_) اٹھات	Ut.#'a:t
	اقلیت	,aqali:;'at
	استثن	,Ist'asn
	اندھیر	'and#e:R
	انتالیس	,Unta:l'i:s
	انتیس	,Unt'i:s
	اکثر	,aks'aR
	ایران	i:R'a:n
	اجتماع	,IJtIm'a:
	استحصال	,Ist,e:Hs.'a:l
	_) امنگ	Um'ang
	انعام	In'a:m
	امتحان	,ImtIH'a:n
	الزام	,Ilz'a:m
	اشتہار	,IStIH'a:R
	اصول	Us.'u:l
	اعلان	e:l'a:n
	اعزاز	e:z'a:z
	انقلاب	,InqIl'a:b
	اصلاح	,Is.l'a:H
	امداد	,Imd'a:d
استعف	Ist'i:f
	L03L03) ات (_S2	a:t
	_) انتظ	'Int,Iz.
	_)اخت(L02ا	,IxtI
	_)اقت(L02ا	,IqtI
	_)اح(L02L06	EH
	_)است(L02ا	,IstI
	_)اشت(L02ا	IStI
	_)ارت(L02ا	,IRtI
	_)ادا(ر	Ida:
	_)انک(L02ا	InkI
	_)انط(L02ا	IntI
	_)انہتر	UnHataR
	_)او(ا	av
	_)انہ(L02L01	InHI
	_)اٹھتال	at.#ta:l
	_)اٹھتر	at.#at:aR
	_)اٹھتیس	at.#ti:s
	_)اٹھلا	It.#la:
	_)اٹھ(و	Ut.#
	_)اکت(L02ا	IktI
	_)اکسا	Uksa:
	_)اکٹھ(L01	Ikat.t.#
	_)اکہر	IkEHR
	_)اکیل	ake:l
	_)ائ	aI
	_)ابال	Uba:l
	_)ابوال(P5	abUl
	L02)او(L02	a:vV
	_)ابھار	Ub#a:R
	_)اتار	Uta:R
	_)اترو(L01	UtaRv
	_)ابکائ	Ubka:
	_)اجت(L02ا	IJtI
	_)اجا(ر	IJa:
	_)اجال	UJa:l
	_)الیکٹ	Ile:kt.
	_)اجاڑ	UJa:r.
	_)اچھال	Uc#a:l
	_)اداس	Uda:s
	_)ادھار	Ud#a:R
	_)ادھڑ(L01	Ud#r.
	_)ادھڑ	Ud#ar.
	_)ادھیڑ	Ud#e:r.
	_)ارا(د	IRa:
	_)اونچ	u:nc
	اں	a~:
	_)انج(L02ا	InJI
	_)امت(L02ا	ImtI
	_)انح(L02ا	InHI
	_)انخ(L02ا	InxI
	_)ابت(L02ا	IbtI
	_)انس(پ	Ins
	_)انس(L02ا	InsI
	_)انس(ٹ	Ins
	_)انسٹھ	Unsat.#
	_)انشا	InSa:
	_)انش(L02L01	InSI
	_)انص(L02ا	Ins.I
	_)انض(L02ا	InzI
	_)انق(L02ا	InqI
	_)الت(L02ا	IltI
	_)انف(L02ا	InfI
	_)احت(L02ا	EHtI
	_)اند(L02ا	IndI
	_)انع(L02ا	InI
	_)انب(L02ا	InbI
	_)انٹر	Int.aR
	_)انک(L01	Ink
	_)ال(L06L06L06P2	al
	_L05)اب(L04_	a:bI
	_L05)ات(L04_	a:tI
	L05)اق(L04_	a:qI
	L05)اش(L04	a:SI
	L05)ال(L04_	a:lI
	L05)اج(L04_	a:JI
	L05)اح(L04_	a:HI
	_L05)ام(L04_	a:mI
	_L05)اط(L04_	a:tI
	_L05)اس(L04_	a:sI
	L05)اف(L04_	a:fI
	_L05)ار(L04_	a:RI
	L05)اظ(L04_	a:z.I
	L05)اص(L04_	a:s.I
	_)اولوال(L06L06L06P6	UlUl
	_)استاد	Usta:d
	ائ(L02	aI
	اٖ	O
	_)اصطL02ا	Is.tI
	_)اجرت	UJRat
	_)اما(م	Ima:
	_)افتاد	Ufta:d
	_)افت(L02ا	IftI
	_)اضط(L02ا	IztI
	_)امتیاز	Imtja:z
	_)اسماعیل	Isma:i:l
	_)اسکندر	IskandaR
	_)اسکول	Isku:l
	آ	a:
	_)اشار	ISa:R
	_)استم(L02L03	Istam
	_)انگیز	ang'e:z
	_)ایس(ٹ	i:s
	_)اہت(L02ا	EHtI
	_)استح(L02ا	IstEH
	_)استد(L03L03L03	Istad
	_)استف(L02L03	Istaf
	_)استق(L02L03	Istaq
	_)استن(L02L03	Istan
	_)استک(L02L03	Istak
	_)استہ(L02L03	IstEH
	_)استب(L02L03	Istab
	_)استخ(L02L03	Istax
	_)استر(L02L03	IstaR
	_)استس(L02L03	Istas
	_)استش(L02L03	IstaS
	_)استص(L02L03	Istas.
	_)استط(L02L03	Istat
	_)استظ(L02L03	Istaz.
	_)استعا	IstIa:
	_)استع(L02L03	Iste:
	_)استغ(L02L03	IstaQ
	_)استل(L02L03	Istal
	_)اس(ٹ	Is
	_)اصط(L02ا	Is.tI
	_)اعا	Ia:
	_)انگریز	angR'e:z
	_)استری	IstIRi:
	_)استسعا	IstIsa:
	_)است(صا	IstI
	L05)اد(L04_	a:dI
	L05)اع(L04	a:I
	L06L07_)ال(L06L06_P2	Ul
	_)اقرب	aqRab
	L02)ای(L02	a:ja
	_)استوا	Istava:
	_)استوار	Ustava:R
	اع(_	a:
	_)افسرد	afsURd
	_)اتحاد	ItIHa:d
	_)اثبات	Isba:t
	_)ادھور	ad#u:R
	_)ادھیل	ad#e:l
	_)ارجمند	aRJUmand
	_)ازال	Iza:l
	_)اس(پL03	Is
	_)اسپیش(L03	Ispe:Sa
	_)اسراف	IsRa:f
	_)اسمگ	Ismag
	_)اسٹی(ن	Ist.e:
	_)اسک(و	Isk
	_)اشارت	ISa:Rat
	_)اشتی(L03	IStI
	_)اشرف	aSRaf
	_)اطاعت	It'a:at
	_)اظہار	Iz.Ha:R
	_)افا(د	Ifa:
	_)افزو(L03	afzu:
	_)اتوا	IltIva:
	_)التیا	IltIa:
	_)اناسی	Una:si:
	_)انتعاش	IntIa:S
	_)انجینیر	InJi:ni;aR
	_)انچاس	Unca:s
	_)اندرون	andRu:n
	_)انگشت	angUSt
	_)انگور	angu:R
	_)انٹیلی	Int.e:li:
	اعت(_	'a:at
	_)اونٹ	u:nt.
	_)اوور	o:vaR
	_)اٹکھیل	at.k#e:l
	_)اکاون	Ika:van
	_)اکتالیس	Ikta:li:s
	_)انج(ی	InJ
	_)استانی	Usta:ni:
	L03)ایہ	a:ja
	_)ان(_دیکھ	an
	L03)ایتی(_	'a:jati:
	_)ایجاد	i:Ja:d
	_)ایما	i:ma:
	_)ایڈمنسٹر(L01	e:d.mInIst.R
	_)ایس(L01	E:s
	_)اینٹ	i:nt.

.group آ
	آ	a:
	آتش	'a:tIS
	آہست	a:H'Ist
	آئ (L02	'a:I
	آمیز	a:me:z
	آویز	a:ve:z
	_)آور	a:vaR
	آبرو	a:bRu:
	_)آلو	a:lu:
	آئڈیل	'a:Id.i;al
	_)آبنوس	a:bnu:s
	_)آزرد	a:zURd
	_)آسود	'a:su:d
	_)آسیب	a:se:b
	_)آگہ(L03	a:gaH
	_)آنو(ل	a~:vV
	_)آرگن	a:Rgan
	آشفت	a:SUft

.group ع
	ع	a:
	عا	a:
	_) ع	a
	_) عیس	'i:s
	_) عید	'i:d
	عنوان	Unv'a:n
	_) عمر	'UmR
	L02) عی (_	'ai:
	علیحد	'alEHd
	عُ	'U
	عِ	I
	_)عبادت	Ib'a:dat
	L03L01L02)ع(_	e:
	_)عسکر	askaR
	_)عما(ر	Ima:
	_)علاق	Ila:q
	_)عموم	Umu:m
	_)عذر	UzR
	L07)ع(L07L01L07	'a:
	_)عرض	aRz
	_)عزت(L03	Izat
	_)علما	Ulama:
	_)عبرت	IbRat
	_)عجز	IJz
	_)عجلت	UJlat
	_)عجوب	aJu:b
	_)عرو(س	URu:
	_)علت	Il:at
	L02)عی(L02	ai:
	_)عقاب	Uqa:b
	_)عرفان	IRfa:n
	_)عصمت	as.mat
	_)عطر	ItR
	_)عبارت	Iba:Rat
	_)عثمان	Usma:n
	_)عصب	as.b
	_)عیب	E:b
	_)عیش	E:S

.group و
	و	o:
	وُ	vU
	وٗ	u:
	و (L01	v
	_) و	vV
	 وع (_	u:
	وّ	v:V
	وّ(L01	v:
	_L07L07L07)و(L07	u:
	L02) ونکہ (_	u:nk'e:H
	_L02)و(L01	av
	L01)و(L01	v
	وؤ	u:o:
	_L02L01)و(L02_	vV
	_)وک(ٹL03	vIk
	وں	o~:
	L07عL07)و(L07	u:
	L03L03)واتیں	va:ti~:
	_)وزرا	vUzaRa:
	_)وقعت	vUqat
	_)ویران	vi:Ra:n
	وابست	va:bast
	_)وز(ٹ	vIzI
	_)وسوس	vasvas
	_)وسعت	vUsat
	_L02)وّ(L01	av:
	_)وعید	vai:d

.group ی
	ی	e:
	ی (L01	j
	ی (_	,i:	// final -i is always long; secondary stress (not primary)
			// needed so ph_hindi_base's i: phoneme doesn't self-demote
			// back to plain i when this syllable isn't the word's own
			// stressed one - see hi_rules for the same fix. Only the
			// two explicitly word-final ("(_") rules get this - @) ی
			// below has no word-end context, so forcing stress there
			// would be wrong for its medial occurrences too.
	_) ی	jV
	L03L02)یع(_	,i:
	@) ی	i:
	@) یں (_	e~:
	یّ	j:
	@)یت(_S2	i:;at
	L03L02)یتیں	iate~:
	L03L02)یتی(_	iati:
	_) یو	jO
	ی (و	e:
	L02)یوں	i;o~:
	L03)یکشن	e:kSan
	یں	e~
	L03)یک(ٹ	e:k
	L03L01)یا(_S2	ja:
	L03)یشنل(_	e:Snal
	_L02)یاIa:
	_)یاقوت	ja:qu:t
	_)یہود	jaHu:d
	L02)یجیے	i:Ji;e:
	L03L03)یشن(_	e:San
	L03L03)یشنز	e:Sanz
	یٰ	a:

.group ے		// yeh barree
	ے	e:

.group ۂ
	ۂ	'ae:

// with hamza
.group ئ
	ئ
	ئیے	ie:

.group ؤ
	ؤ	o:

.group ﺅ
	ﺅ	o:

.group أ
	أ	// ??


// CONSONANTS

.group ب
	ب	bV
	بھ	b#V
	بھ (L01	b#
	ب (L01	b	
	بّ	b:V
	بّ (L01	b:
	_) بگڑ	bIg'ar.
	_) بگڑ (L01	b'Igr.
	_) بکھر	bIkh'aR
	_) بکھر (L01	b'IkhR
	_) بچھڑ	bIch'ar.
	_) بچھڑ (L01	bIchr.
	_) بجھ	b'UJh
	بھوک	bh'u:k
	بھیک	bh'i:k
	بھیگ	bh'i:g
	بھول	bh'u:l
	_) بیان	baj'a:n
	_) بٹھا	b'It.#a:
	بئی	b'ai:
	بیوی	b'i:vi:
	_) بیوا	b'e:va:
	برسر	b,aRs'aR
	بگاڑ	bIg'a:r.
	بغاوت	b,aQa:v'at
	_) بہ (L02	b'EH
	بزرگ	b'UzUR,g
	_) بدل (L02	badal
	بوڑھ	b'u:r.h
	_)بے(P2	be:
	بحران	b,OHR'a:n
	_)بپھر(L01	bIp#R
	_)بچھ	bIc#
	_)بخار	bUxa:R
	_)برائی	bURa:i
	_)بوا(ئ	boa:
	_)بزدل	bUzdIl
	_)بال(L06L06L06P3	bIl
	_)بنیاد	bUni;a:d
	_)بیم	bi:m
	_)بیوقوف	be:vaqu:f
	_)بلند	bUland
	_)بہشت	baHISt
	بْ	b
	_)بسمل	bIsmIl
	_)بہادر	baHa:dUR
	_)باشند	ba:SInd
	_)بستر	bIstaR
	_)بھکا(ر	b#Ika:
	_)بڈھ(L01	bUd.#
	_)برکت	baRkat
	_)برہان	bURHa:n
	_)باسکٹ	ba:skIt.
	_)بری(ک	bRe:
	_)بریکٹ	bRe:kIt.
	_)بست(گ	bast
	_)بوند	bu:nd
	_)بوٹ	bu:t.
	_)بٹیر	bat.e:R
	_)بڑھ	bar.h
	_)بکتر	baktaR
	_)بکھیر	bIk#e:R
	_)بکھیڑ	bak#e:r.
	_)برادر	bIRa:daR
	_)بدعت	bIdat
	_)بھنبھن	b#Inb#In

.group پ
	پ	pV
	پھ	p#V
	پ (L01	p
	پھ (L01	p#
	پّ	p:V
	پّ(L01	p:
	_) پھر	ph'IR
	پھول	ph'u:l
	_) پہ (L02	p'EH
	پہنچ	paH'Unc
	پوچھ	p'u:c#
	پیچھ	p'i:c#
	پھونک	p#'u:nk
	_) پور (L01	p'u:R
	_)پچھل(L01	pIc#l
	_)پہن(L01	pEHn
	_)پہ(L02_	pEHE
	_)پران(L01	pURa:n
	پْ	p
	_)پرند	paRInd
	_)پھوپھ	p#u:p#
	_)پارسل	pa:Rsal
	_)پوائن	pUa:In
	_)پھوٹ	p#u:t.
	_)پبل(ش	pablI
	_)پرمٹ	paRmIt.
	_)پگھل(L01	pIg#l
	_)پونج	pu:nJ
	_)پیوند	pe:vand
	_)پیوست	pE:vast
	_)پردیس	paRde:s
	_)پیٹت(L01_	pi:t.t
	_)پیٹن(L01_	pi:t.n
	_)پو(ج	pu:
	پرہیز	paRHe:z
	_)پرور	paRvaR
	_)پرورش	paRvaRIS
	_)پرو(ف	pRo:
	_)پروفیسر	pRo:fe:saR
	_)پروگر	pRogR
	_)پروم	pRo:m
	_)پکار	pUka:R
	_)پنہا	pInHa:
	_)پرن(ٹ	pRIn
	_)پروڈیو(س	pRo:d.ju:
	L03L03)پنگ(_	pIng
	_)پنڈت	pand.It

.group ت
	ت	tV
	تھ	t#V
	ت (L01	t
	تھ (L01	t#
	تّ	t:V
	تّ (L01	t:
	_) تمہ	t'UmH
	تحقیق	t,EHq'i:q
	_) ترجم	t'aRJ,Um
	_) تہ (L02	t'EH
	_) تجز	t'aJz
	تقرر	taq'aRUR
	تجرب	taJ'aRb
	_) تیار	t,ai:;'a:R
	_) تیسر	t'i:sR
	L03L03)تا(_S2	ta:
	L03L03) تی (_S2	ti:
	L03L03) تے (_S2	te:
	_) توا	t'ava:
	تہ(_	ta
	_)تصور	tas.av:UR
	_)تحریر	tEHRi:R
	تْ	t
	_)تح(L02ی	tEH
	_)تلخ	talx
	_)تمنا	taman:a:
	_)تمھ	tUmh
	_)تمہید	tamHi:d
	_)تبصر	tabs.aR
	_)تغیر	taQai:jUR
	_)تفرق	tafaR:Uq
	_)تذکر(L03	tazkIR
	_)تجلی	taJal:i:
	_)تجوری	tIJo:Ri:
	_)تربت	tURbat
	_)تخیل	taxai:jUl
	_)تلمل	tIlmIl
	_)تنقل	tanaq:Ul
	تہذیب	tEHzi:b
	_)تہمت	tOHmat
	_)تجارت	tIJ'a:Rat
	L02L02)تیں(_S3	ti~:
	_)تیکھ	ti:k#
	_)تتلا	tUtla:
	_)تتلی	tItli:
	_)تیما	ti:ma:	

.group ٹ
	ٹ	t.V
	ٹھ	t.#V
	ٹ (L01	t.
	ٹھ (L01	t.#
	ٹّ	t.t.V
	ٹّ (L01	t.t.
	ٹریفک	t.R'e:fIk
	_) ٹکڑ	t.'Ukr.
	_) ٹہ (L02	t.'EH
	_) ٹرین	t.R'e:n
	_) ٹیم	t.i:m
	ٹْ	t.
	_)ٹھکرا	t.#UkRa:
	L03L03)ٹ(س_	t.
	L03)ٹنگ	t.Ing
	_)ٹر(L01	t.R
	_)ٹوٹ(L01	t.u:t.
	_)ٹھٹھر(L01	t.#It.#R
	_)ٹھٹھک(L01	t.#It.#k
	_)ٹکٹک	t.Ikt.Ik
	_)ٹکنک	t.IknIk
	_)ٹھاکر	t.#'a:kUR
	_)ٹھمر	t.#UmR
	_)ٹمک(L01	t.#Umk
	_)ٹھکان	t.#Ika:n
	_)ٹھہر(L01	t.#EHR
	_)ٹہن	t.EHn
	_)ٹیچر	t.'i:caR		

.group ث
	ث	sV
	ث (L01	s
	ثّ	s:V
	ثّ(L01	s:
	ثْ	s
	ثبوت	sUbu:t
	_)ثروت	saRvat


.group ج
	ج	JV
	جھ	J#V
	ج (L01	J
	جھ (L01	J#
	جّ	J:V
	جّ (L01	J:
	_) جیت	J'i:t
	_) جوا	J'ava:
	جانب	J'a:nIb
	_) جنس	J'Ins
	جھوٹ	J#'u:t.
	_) جمل	J'Uml
	_) جہ (L02	J'EH
	_) جدا	J'Uda:
	_)جذب	JaDb
	_)جھک	J#Uk
	_)جنگجو	JangJu:
	_)جھلمل	J#IlmIl
	_)جماعت	Jama:t
	_)جسم	JIsm
	جْ	J
	_)جتن(L01	JItn
	_)جہاد	JIHa:d
	_)جلوس	JUlu:s
	_)جرمان	JURma:n
	_)جتوا	JItva:
	_)جاسوس	Ja:su:s
	_)جہنم	JaHan:Um
	_)جرنیل	JaRne:l
	_)جزئ	JUz
	_)جارح	Ja:RIH
	_)جاسک	Ja:sak
	_)جنتر	JantaR
	_)جھلس(L01	J#Uls
	_)جاود	Ja:vId
	_)جاوید	Ja:ve:d
	_)جگال	JUga:l
	_)جگجگ	JagJag
	_)جگمگ	Jagmag	

.group چ
	چ	cV
	چھ	c#V
	چ (L01	c
	چھ (L01	c#
	چّ	c:V
	چّ (L01	c:
	_) چکا	c'Uka:
	_) چہ (L02	c'EH
	_) چیز	c'i:z
	_) چوم	c'u:m
	چْ	c
	چپقلش	capqalIS
	@)چہ(_	ca
	_)چکن(L01	cIkn
	_)چیخ	ci:x
	_)چبھ	cUb#
	_)چاکلیٹ	ca:kle:t.
	_)چھین	c#i:n
	_)چٹکی	cUt.ki:
	_)چپڑ(L01	cUpr.
	_)چپک(L01	cIpk
	_)چپیٹ	cape:t.
	_)چچیر	cace:R
	_)چتکبر	cItkabR
	_)چابک	ca:bUk
	_)چوس(L01	cu:s
	_)چوسٹھ	cO:sat.#
	_)چولھ	cu:lh
	_)چھٹکار	c#Ut.ka:R
	_)چٹھی	cIt.#:i:
	_)چڑچڑ	cIr.cIr.
	_)چڑی	cIr.i:
	_)چڑیل	cUr.e:l
	_)چھڑک(L01	c#Ir.k
	_)چغل(L01	cUQl
	_)چقندر	cUqandaR
	_)چھہتر	c#IhataR

.group ح
	ح	HV
	ح (L01	H
	ح (_	'aH
	L01) ح (_	H
	حکومت	H,Uku:m'at
	حکمران	H,UkmaR'a:n
	_) حوال	Hav'a:l
	_)حمایت	HIm'a:jat
	حْ	H
	_)حماقت	HIma:qat
	_)حسرت	HasRat
	_)حور	Hu:R
	_)حکمت	HIkmat
	_)حشمت	HaSmat
	_)حصار	HIs.a:R
	_)حجر	HaJR
	_)حضور	HUzu:R
	حّ	H:V
	حّ(L01	H:
	_)حیا	Haja:
	_)حرکت	HaRkat
	حرمت	HURmat
	_)حویل	Have:l
	_)حرفت	HIRfat
	_)حریت	HURi;at
	_)حکای(L02	HIk'a:ja
	_)حیل	Hi:l
	_)حیلت	Hi:lat
